Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-202] Exclusive, continuing
jurisdiction. (a) Except as otherwise provided in section 583A-204, a
court of this State which has made a child-custody determination consistent
with section 583A-201 or 583A-203 has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over
the determination until:

(1) A court of this State determines that the child,
the child's parents, and any person acting as a parent do not have a
significant connection with this State and that substantial evidence is no
longer available in this State concerning the child's care, protection,
training, and personal relationships; or

(2) A court of this State or a court of another state
determines that the child, the child's parents, and any person acting as a
parent do not presently reside in this State.

(b) A court of this State which has made a
child-custody determination and does not have exclusive, continuing
jurisdiction under this section may modify that determination only if it has
jurisdiction to make an initial determination under section 583A-201. [L 2002,
c 124, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Where family court correctly concluded that Hawaii no longer
had exclusive, continuing jurisdiction because Louisiana "took exclusive
jurisdiction over issues pertaining to the custody and support of the children
with the consent of both father and mother", Hawaii no longer had
jurisdiction and the family court thus had no authority to modify the October
13, 2009 order. 126 H. 58 (App.), 266 P.3d 466 (2011).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next